District of Columbia statutes.
4-404.01

Supplemental payments by the Mayor.

(a)

The Mayor is hereby authorized to supplement the cost of child care services with District funds when appropriated and available for the following:

(1)

Children of families who are receiving assistance under the TANF program and whose families are attempting through work activities to transition off the TANF program;

(2)

Children of families who are at-risk of becoming dependent on the TANF program;

(3)

Children of families who are low-income but working, as defined by the TANF program;

(4)

Children receiving protective care services; and

(5)

Children in foster care placement when the foster care provider is working, if only one foster care provider is in the home, when both foster care providers are working, if 2 foster care providers are in the home, and child care services are in the best interest of the child.

(b)

Any child care funds available under title IV-E of the Social Security Act, approved June 17, 1980 (94 Stat. 501; 42 U.S.C. § 670 et seq.), shall be the first source for reimbursement to the District for the cost of child care for children in foster care.

(c)

The supplemental payment authorized by this section shall be paid, in accordance with a daily rate and sliding fee scale, directly to the child development center, child development home, relative, or in-home care giver actually providing services.

History

Sept. 19, 1979, D.C. Law 3-16, § 5a
as added Apr. 13, 1999, D.C. Law 12-216, § 2(d), 46 DCR 281

Section References

This section is referenced in § 4-409.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 3-304.1.

Temporary Legislation

For temporary (225 day) addition of section, see § 2(d) of Day Care Policy Temporary Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Law 12-72, March 20, 1998, law notification 45 DCR 2107).

Emergency Legislation

For temporary addition of section, see § 2(d) of the Day Care Policy Emergency Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Act 12-509, November 10, 1998, 45 DCR 8146), and § 2(d) of the Day Care Policy Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 1999 (D.C. Act 13-12, February 8, 1999, 46 DCR 2330).
For temporary issuance of rules by the Mayor, see § 3 of the Day Care Policy Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 1999 (D.C. Act 13-12, February 8, 1999, 46 DCR 2330).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of section, see § 2 of the Foster Care Extended Eligibility Emergency Amendment Act of 2015 (D.C. Act 21-200, Nov. 23, 2015, 62 DCR 15270).

Editor's Notes

Mayor authorized to issue rules: Section 3 of D.C. Law 12-216 authorized the Mayor to issue rules to implement the provisions of this section, pursuant to Title 1 of the District of Columbia Administrative Procedures Act, D.C. Code § 2-501 et seq.